Indiana, session 2026, SB290.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-13-3-27, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), on
request, a law enforcement agency shall release a limited criminal
history to or allow inspection of a limited criminal history by
noncriminal justice organizations or individuals only if the subject of
the request:
(1) has applied for employment with a noncriminal justice
organization or individual;
(2) has:
(A) applied for a license or is maintaining a license; and
(B) provided criminal history data as required by law to be
provided in connection with the license;
(3) is a candidate for public office or a public official;
(4) is in the process of being apprehended by a law enforcement
agency;
(5) is placed under arrest for the alleged commission of a crime;
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(6) has charged that the subject's rights have been abused
repeatedly by criminal justice agencies;
(7) is the subject of a judicial decision or determination with
respect to the setting of bond, plea bargaining, sentencing, or
probation;
(8) has volunteered services that involve contact with, care of, or
supervision over a child who is being placed, matched, or
monitored by a social services agency or a nonprofit corporation;
(9) is currently residing in a location designated by the
department of child services (established by IC 31-25-1-1) or by
a juvenile court as the out-of-home placement for a child at the
time the child will reside in the location;
(10) has volunteered services at a public school (as defined in
IC 20-18-2-15) or nonpublic school (as defined in IC 20-18-2-12)
that involve contact with, care of, or supervision over a student
enrolled in the school;
(11) is being investigated for welfare fraud by an investigator of
the division of family resources or a county office of the division
of family resources;
(12) is being sought by the parent locator service of the child
support bureau of the department of child services;
(13) is or was required to register as a sex or violent offender
under IC 11-8-8;
(14) has been convicted of any of the following:
(A) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1), if the victim is less than eighteen
(18) years of age.
(B) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (repealed), if the
victim is less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(C) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(D) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(E) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(F) Vicarious sexual gratification (IC 35-42-4-5).
(G) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(H) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(I) Sexual misconduct with a minor as a felony (IC 35-42-4-9).
(J) Sex with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9.5).
(J) (K) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3), if the victim is less than eighteen
(18) years of age;
(15) is identified as a possible perpetrator of child abuse or
neglect in an assessment conducted by the department of child
services under IC 31-33-8; or
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(16) is:
(A) a parent, guardian, or custodian of a child; or
(B) an individual who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and
resides in the home of the parent, guardian, or custodian;
with whom the department of child services or a county probation
department has a case plan, dispositional decree, or permanency
plan approved under IC 31-34 or IC 31-37 that provides for
reunification following an out-of-home placement.
However, limited criminal history information obtained from the
National Crime Information Center may not be released under this
section except to the extent permitted by the Attorney General of the
United States.
(b) A law enforcement agency shall allow inspection of a limited
criminal history by and release a limited criminal history to the
following noncriminal justice organizations:
(1) Federally chartered or insured banking institutions.
(2) Officials of state and local government for any of the
following purposes:
(A) Employment with a state or local governmental entity.
(B) Licensing.
(3) Segments of the securities industry identified under 15 U.S.C.
78q(f)(2).
(c) Any person who knowingly or intentionally uses limited criminal
history for any purpose not specified under this section commits a
Class C infraction. However, the violation is a Class A misdemeanor
if the person has a prior unrelated adjudication or conviction for a
violation of this section within the previous five (5) years.
SECTION 2. IC 11-8-8-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) Except as provided in section 22 of this
chapter, as used in this chapter, "sex offender" means a person
convicted of any of the following offenses:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(5) Vicarious sexual gratification (including performing sexual
conduct in the presence of a minor) (IC 35-42-4-5).
(6) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(7) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(8) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9) as a Class A,
Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a
crime committed after June 30, 2014), unless:
(A) the person is convicted of sexual misconduct with a minor
as a Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014);
(B) the person is not more than:
(i) four (4) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed after June 30, 2007; or
(ii) five (5) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed before July 1, 2007; and
(C) the sentencing court finds that the person should not be
required to register as a sex offender.
(9) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(10) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
(11) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2), if the victim is less than eighteen
(18) years of age, and the person who kidnapped the victim is not
the victim's parent or guardian.
(12) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3), if the victim is less
than eighteen (18) years of age, and the person who confined or
removed the victim is not the victim's parent or guardian.
(13) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(14) Promoting prostitution (IC 35-45-4-4) as a Class B felony
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 4 felony
(for a crime committed after June 30, 2014).
(15) Promotion of human sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.1.
(16) Promotion of child sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.2(a).
(17) Promotion of sexual trafficking of a younger child (IC
35-42-3.5-1.2(c)).
(18) Child sexual trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5-1.3).
(19) Human trafficking under IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 if the victim is
less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(20) Sexual misconduct by a service provider with a detained or
supervised child (IC 35-44.1-3-10(c)).
(21) Sex with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9.5).
(b) The term includes:
(1) a person who is required to register as a sex offender in any
jurisdiction; and
(2) a child who has committed a delinquent act, or a person
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


prosecuted under IC 31-30-1-4(d) for an offense described in
subsection (a) committed when the person was less than eighteen
(18) years of age, but who was at least twenty-one (21) years of
age when the charge was filed, and who:
(A) is at least fourteen (14) years of age;
(B) is on probation, is on parole, is discharged from a facility
by the department of correction, is discharged from a secure
private facility (as defined in IC 31-9-2-115), or is discharged
from a juvenile detention facility as a result of an adjudication
as a delinquent child for an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult; and
(C) is found by a court by clear and convincing evidence to be
likely to repeat an act that would be an offense described in
subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
(c) In making a determination under subsection (b)(2)(C), the court
shall consider expert testimony concerning whether a child is likely to
repeat an act that would be an offense described in subsection (a) if
committed by an adult.
(d) A person ordered to register under subsection (b)(2) may
petition the court to reconsider the order at any time after completing
court ordered sex offender treatment. The court shall consider expert
testimony concerning whether a child or person is likely to repeat an
offense described in subsection (a) or an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
SECTION 3. IC 11-8-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in section 22 of this
chapter, as used in this chapter, "sex or violent offender" means a
person convicted of any of the following offenses:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(5) Vicarious sexual gratification (including performing sexual
conduct in the presence of a minor) (IC 35-42-4-5).
(6) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(7) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(8) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9) as a Class A,
Class B, or Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 1, Level 2, Level 4, or Level 5 felony (for a
crime committed after June 30, 2014), unless:
(A) the person is convicted of sexual misconduct with a minor
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


as a Class C felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
2014) or a Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014);
(B) the person is not more than:
(i) four (4) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed after June 30, 2007; or
(ii) five (5) years older than the victim if the offense was
committed before July 1, 2007; and
(C) the sentencing court finds that the person should not be
required to register as a sex offender.
(9) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(10) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
(11) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2), if the victim is less than eighteen
(18) years of age, and the person who kidnapped the victim is not
the victim's parent or guardian.
(12) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3), if the victim is less
than eighteen (18) years of age, and the person who confined or
removed the victim is not the victim's parent or guardian.
(13) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(14) Promoting prostitution (IC 35-45-4-4) as a Class B felony
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 4 felony
(for a crime committed after June 30, 2014).
(15) Promotion of human sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.1.
(16) Promotion of child sexual trafficking under
IC 35-42-3.5-1.2(a).
(17) Promotion of sexual trafficking of a younger child (IC
35-42-3.5-1.2(c)).
(18) Child sexual trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5-1.3).
(19) Human trafficking under IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 if the victim is
less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(20) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(21) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(22) Sexual misconduct by a service provider with a detained or
supervised child (IC 35-44.1-3-10(c)).
(23) Sex with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9.5).
(b) The term includes:
(1) a person who is required to register as a sex or violent
offender in any jurisdiction; and
(2) a child who has committed a delinquent act, or a person
prosecuted under IC 31-30-1-4(d) for an offense described in
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


subsection (a) committed when the person was less than eighteen
(18) years of age, but who was at least twenty-one (21) years of
age when the charge was filed, and who:
(A) is at least fourteen (14) years of age;
(B) is on probation, is on parole, is discharged from a facility
by the department of correction, is discharged from a secure
private facility (as defined in IC 31-9-2-115), or is discharged
from a juvenile detention facility as a result of an adjudication
as a delinquent child for an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult; and
(C) is found by a court by clear and convincing evidence to be
likely to repeat an act that would be an offense described in
subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
(c) In making a determination under subsection (b)(2)(C), the court
shall consider expert testimony concerning whether a child is likely to
repeat an act that would be an offense described in subsection (a) if
committed by an adult.
(d) A person ordered to register under subsection (b)(2) may
petition the court to reconsider the order at any time after completing
court ordered sex offender treatment. The court shall consider expert
testimony concerning whether a child or person is likely to repeat an
offense described in subsection (a) or an act that would be an offense
described in subsection (a) if committed by an adult.
SECTION 4. IC 11-10-11.5-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 161, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) While assigned to a
community transition program, a person must comply with:
(1) the rules concerning the conduct of persons in the community
transition program, including rules related to payments described
in section 12 of this chapter, that are adopted by the community
corrections advisory board establishing the program or, in
counties that are not served by a community corrections program,
that are jointly adopted by the courts in the county with felony
jurisdiction; and
(2) any conditions established by the sentencing court for the
person.
(b) As a rule of the community transition program, a person
convicted of a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2) may not use a
social networking website (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-307) or an
instant messaging or chat room program (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-173) to communicate, directly or through an intermediary,
with a child less than sixteen (16) eighteen (18) years of age. However,
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


the rules of the community transition program may permit the offender
to communicate using a social networking website or an instant
messaging or chat room program with:
(1) the offender's own child, stepchild, or sibling; or
(2) another relative of the offender specifically named in the rules
applicable to that person.
(c) As a rule of the community transition program, an individual
may be required to receive:
(1) addiction counseling;
(2) inpatient detoxification;
(3) case management;
(4) daily living skills; and
(5) medication assisted treatment, including a federal Food and
Drug Administration approved long acting, nonaddictive
medication for the treatment of opioid or alcohol dependence.
SECTION 5. IC 11-13-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 94, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A condition to remaining on parole is that
the parolee not commit a crime during the period of parole.
(b) The parole board may also adopt, under IC 4-22-2, additional
conditions to remaining on parole and require a parolee to satisfy one
(1) or more of these conditions. These conditions must be reasonably
related to the parolee's successful reintegration into the community and
not unduly restrictive of a fundamental right.
(c) If a person is released on parole, the parolee shall be given a
written statement of the conditions of parole. Signed copies of this
statement shall be:
(1) retained by the parolee;
(2) forwarded to any person charged with the parolee's
supervision; and
(3) placed in the parolee's master file.
(d) The parole board may modify parole conditions if the parolee
receives notice of that action and had ten (10) days after receipt of the
notice to express the parolee's views on the proposed modification.
This subsection does not apply to modification of parole conditions
after a revocation proceeding under section 10 of this chapter.
(e) As a condition of parole, the parole board may require the
parolee to reside in a particular parole area. In determining a parolee's
residence requirement, the parole board shall:
(1) consider:
(A) the residence of the parolee prior to the parolee's
incarceration; and
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(B) the parolee's place of employment; and
(2) assign the parolee to reside in the county where the parolee
resided prior to the parolee's incarceration unless assignment on
this basis would be detrimental to the parolee's successful
reintegration into the community.
(f) As a condition of parole, the parole board may require the
parolee to:
(1) periodically undergo a laboratory chemical test (as defined in
IC 9-13-2-22) or series of tests to detect and confirm the presence
of a controlled substance (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-7); and
(2) have the results of any test under this subsection reported to
the parole board by the laboratory.
The parolee is responsible for any charges resulting from a test
required under this subsection. However, a person's parole may not be
revoked on the basis of the person's inability to pay for a test under this
subsection.
(g) As a condition of parole, the parole board:
(1) may require a parolee who is a sex offender (as defined in
IC 11-8-8-4.5) to:
(A) participate in a treatment program for sex offenders
approved by the parole board; and
(B) avoid contact with any person who is less than sixteen (16)
eighteen (18) years of age unless the parolee:
(i) receives the parole board's approval; or
(ii) successfully completes the treatment program referred to
in clause (A); and
(2) shall:
(A) require a parolee who is a sex or violent offender (as
defined in IC 11-8-8-5) to register with a local law
enforcement authority under IC 11-8-8;
(B) prohibit a parolee who is a sex offender from residing
within one thousand (1,000) feet of school property (as defined
in IC 35-31.5-2-285) for the period of parole, unless the sex
offender obtains written approval from the parole board;
(C) prohibit a parolee who is a sex offender convicted of a sex
offense (as defined in IC 35-38-2-2.5) from residing within
one (1) mile of the victim of the sex offender's sex offense
unless the sex offender obtains a waiver under IC 35-38-2-2.5;
(D) prohibit a parolee who is a sex offender from owning,
operating, managing, being employed by, or volunteering at
any attraction designed to be primarily enjoyed by children
less than sixteen (16) eighteen (18) years of age;
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(E) require a parolee who is a sex offender to consent:
(i) to the search of the sex offender's personal computer at
any time; and
(ii) to the installation on the sex offender's personal
computer or device with Internet capability, at the sex
offender's expense, of one (1) or more hardware or software
systems to monitor Internet usage; and
(F) prohibit the sex offender from:
(i) accessing or using certain websites, chat rooms, or instant
messaging programs frequented by children; and
(ii) deleting, erasing, or tampering with information on the
sex offender's personal computer with intent to conceal an
activity prohibited by item (i).
The parole board may not grant a sexually violent predator (as defined
in IC 35-38-1-7.5) or a sex offender who is an offender against children
under IC 35-42-4-11 a waiver under subdivision (2)(B) or (2)(C). If the
parole board allows the sex offender to reside within one thousand
(1,000) feet of school property under subdivision (2)(B), the parole
board shall notify each school within one thousand (1,000) feet of the
sex offender's residence of the order.
(h) The address of the victim of a parolee who is a sex offender
convicted of a sex offense (as defined in IC 35-38-2-2.5) is
confidential, even if the sex offender obtains a waiver under
IC 35-38-2-2.5.
(i) As a condition of parole, the parole board may require a parolee
to participate in a reentry court program.
(j) This subsection does not apply to a person on lifetime parole. As
a condition of parole, the parole board shall require a parolee who is a
sexually violent predator under IC 35-38-1-7.5 or who is a sex or
violent offender (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5) to wear a monitoring
device (as described in IC 35-38-2.5-3) that can transmit information
twenty-four (24) hours each day regarding a person's precise location,
subject to a validated sex offender risk assessment, and subject to the
amount appropriated to the department for a monitoring program as a
condition of parole.
(k) As a condition of parole, the parole board may prohibit, in
accordance with IC 35-38-2-2.6, a parolee who has been convicted of
stalking from residing within one thousand (1,000) feet of the residence
of the victim of the stalking for a period that does not exceed five (5)
years.
(l) As a condition of parole, the parole board may prohibit a parolee
convicted of an offense under IC 35-46-3 from owning, harboring, or
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


training an animal, and, if the parole board prohibits a parolee
convicted of an offense under IC 35-46-3 from having direct or indirect
contact with an individual, the parole board may also prohibit the
parolee from having direct or indirect contact with any animal
belonging to the individual.
(m) As a condition of parole, the parole board may require a parolee
to receive:
(1) addiction counseling;
(2) inpatient detoxification;
(3) case management;
(4) daily living skills; and
(5) medication assisted treatment, including a federal Food and
Drug Administration approved long acting, nonaddictive
medication for the treatment of opioid or alcohol dependence.
(n) A parolee may be responsible for the reasonable expenses, as
determined by the department, of the parolee's participation in a
treatment or other program required as a condition of parole under this
section. However, a person's parole may not be revoked solely on the
basis of the person's inability to pay for a program required as a
condition of parole under this section.
(o) As a condition of parole, the parole board shall prohibit a person
convicted of an animal abuse offense (as defined in IC 35-38-2-2.8)
from owning, harboring, or training a companion animal (as defined in
IC 35-38-2-2.8).
SECTION 6. IC 16-21-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2024,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A hospital licensed under IC 16-21-2 that
provides general medical and surgical hospital services shall provide
forensic medical exams and additional forensic services to all alleged
sex crime victims who apply for forensic medical exams and additional
forensic services in relation to injuries or trauma resulting from the
alleged sex crime. To the extent practicable, the hospital shall use a
sexual assault examination kit to conduct forensic exams and provide
forensic services. The provision of services may not be dependent on
a victim's reporting to, or cooperating with, law enforcement.
(b) For the purposes of this chapter, the following crimes are
considered sex crimes:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (repealed).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Vicarious sexual gratification (IC 35-42-4-5).
(5) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(6) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9).
(7) Sex with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9.5).
(7) (8) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(8) (9) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(9) (10) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(c) Payment for services under this section shall be processed in
accordance with rules adopted by the division.
SECTION 7. IC 16-34-2-4.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.173-2017,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.2. (a) This section applies only if consent is
required under section 4 of this chapter and has not been given.
(b) This section does not apply to a person who aids or assists an
unemancipated pregnant minor who has obtained or is seeking to
obtain:
(1) parental consent; or
(2) a waiver of parental consent;
under section 4 of this chapter.
(c) A person may not knowingly or intentionally aid or assist an
unemancipated pregnant minor in obtaining an abortion without the
consent required by section 4 of this chapter.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (g), a person who violates
subsection (c) is civilly liable to the unemancipated pregnant minor and
the parent or legal guardian or custodian of the unemancipated
pregnant minor. A court may award damages to the unemancipated
pregnant minor or the parent or legal guardian or custodian of the
unemancipated pregnant minor who is adversely affected by a violation
of this section, including the following damages:
(1) Compensation for physical or emotional injury, without the
need of being physically present at the act or event.
(2) Attorney's fees.
(3) Court costs.
(4) Punitive damages.
However, an adult who engaged in or consented to another person
engaging in a sex act with a minor in violation of IC 35-42-4-3(a), or
IC 35-42-4-9, or IC 35-42-4-9.5 that resulted in the pregnancy may not
be awarded damages under this subsection.
(e) An unemancipated pregnant minor does not have the capacity to
consent to any action in violation of this section or section 4 of this
chapter. A person may not use as a defense to a violation of subsection
(c) that the abortion was performed or induced with consent of the
unemancipated pregnant minor and otherwise met the requirements of
this chapter.
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(f) The parent or legal guardian or custodian of the unemancipated
pregnant minor may petition a court to enjoin conduct that would
violate this section if the parent or legal guardian or custodian can
show that the conduct is reasonably anticipated to occur in the future.
A court may enjoin conduct that would violate this section.
(g) A person may not bring a cause of action under this section
against a person who is related to the minor as a:
(1) parent or stepparent;
(2) grandparent or stepgrandparent; or
(3) sibling or stepsibling.
SECTION 8. IC 31-11-1-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.94-2020,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) A minor who is sixteen (16) or seventeen
(17) years of age may petition the juvenile court in the county in which
the minor resides for an order granting the minor approval to marry and
completely emancipating the minor. The petition must contain the
following information:
(1) The minor's name, gender, and age.
(2) Documentary proof of the minor's date of birth.
(3) The minor's address, and how long the minor has resided at
that address.
(4) The following information with regard to the intended spouse:
(A) The intended spouse's name, gender, and age.
(B) Documentary proof of the intended spouse's date of birth.
(C) The intended spouse's address, and how long the intended
spouse has resided at that address.
(5) A statement of:
(A) the reasons the minor desires to marry;
(B) how the minor and the intended spouse came to know each
other; and
(C) how long the minor and the intended spouse have known
each other.
(6) Copies of:
(A) any criminal records of the minor and of the intended
spouse; and
(B) any protective order:
(i) issued to protect or restrain either the minor or the
intended spouse; and
(ii) relating to domestic or family violence, a sexual offense,
or stalking.
(7) Evidence that the minor has demonstrated maturity and
capacity for self-sufficiency and self-support independent of the
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


minor's parents or legal guardians or the intended spouse,
including proof that the minor:
(A) has graduated from high school;
(B) has obtained a high school equivalency diploma;
(C) has a plan for continued education;
(D) has completed a vocational training or certificate program;
(E) has attained a professional licensure or certification; or
(F) has maintained stable housing or employment for at least
three (3) consecutive months prior to filing the petition.
(b) A court with which a petition under subsection (a) is filed shall:
(1) set a date for an evidentiary hearing on the petition;
(2) provide reasonable notice of the hearing to the minor and the
minor's parents or legal guardians; and
(3) appoint an attorney to serve as guardian ad litem for the
minor.
(c) At the evidentiary hearing, the court shall conduct an in camera
interview with the minor separate from the minor's parents or legal
guardians and intended spouse.
(d) Following the evidentiary hearing, and subject to subsection (e),
the court may grant the petition if the court finds all of the following:
(1) The minor is a county resident who is at least sixteen (16)
years of age.
(2) The intended spouse is not more than four (4) years older than
the minor.
(3) The minor's decision to marry is voluntary, and free from
force, fraud, or coercion.
(4) The minor is mature enough to make a decision to marry.
(5) The minor has established the minor's capacity to be
self-sufficient and self-supporting independent of the minor's
parents, legal guardians, and intended spouse.
(6) The minor understands the rights and responsibilities of
parties to marriage and of completely emancipated minors.
(7) It is in the best interests of the minor for the court to grant the
petition to marry and to completely emancipate the minor. In
making the determination under this subdivision, the court shall
consider how marriage and emancipation may affect the minor's
health, safety, education, and welfare.
A court that grants a petition under this section shall issue written
findings regarding the court's conclusions under subdivisions (1)
through (7).
(e) The following, considered independently or together, are not
sufficient to determine the best interests of a minor for purposes of this
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


section:
(1) The fact that the minor or the intended spouse is pregnant or
has had a child.
(2) The wishes of the parents or legal guardians of the minor.
However, there is a rebuttable presumption that marriage and
emancipation are not in the best interests of the minor if both parents
of the minor oppose the minor's marriage and emancipation.
(f) The juvenile court shall deny a petition under this section if the
court finds any of the following:
(1) The intended spouse:
(A) is or was in a position of authority or special trust in
relation to the minor; or
(B) has or had a professional relationship with the minor, as
defined in IC 35-42-4-7.
(2) The intended spouse has been convicted of, or entered into a
diversion program for, an offense under IC 35-42:
(A) that involves an act of violence;
(B) of which a child was the victim; or
(C) that is an offense under:
(i) IC 35-42-3.5; or
(ii) IC 35-42-4.
(3) Either the minor or the intended spouse is pregnant or is the
mother of a child, and the court finds by a preponderance of
evidence that:
(A) the other party to the marriage is the father of the child or
unborn child; and
(B) the conception of the child or unborn child resulted from
the commission of an offense under:
(i) IC 35-42-4-3 (child molesting);
(ii) IC 35-42-4-6 (child solicitation);
(iii) IC 35-42-4-7 (child seduction); or
(iv) IC 35-42-4-9 (sexual misconduct with a minor); or
(v) IC 35-42-4-9.5 (sex with a minor).
(4) The intended spouse has previously been enjoined by a
protective order relating to domestic or family violence, a sexual
offense, or stalking, regardless of whether the person protected by
the order was the minor.
(g) If a court grants a petition under this section, the court shall also
issue an order of complete emancipation of the minor and provide a
certified copy of the order to the minor.
(h) A minor emancipated under this section is considered to have all
the rights and responsibilities of an adult, except as provided under
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


specific constitutional or statutory age requirements that apply to the
minor because of the minor's age, including requirements related to
voting, use of alcoholic beverages or tobacco products, and other health
and safety regulations.
(i) A court hearing a petition under this section may issue any other
order the court considers appropriate for the minor's protection.
(j) A court that grants a petition under this section may require that
both parties to the marriage complete premarital counseling with a
marriage and family therapist licensed under IC 25-22.5, IC 25-23.6-8,
or IC 25-33.
(k) A court that grants a petition under this section may impose any
other condition on the grant of the petition that the court determines is
reasonable under the circumstances.
SECTION 9. IC 31-19-2.5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as
provided in subsection (b), IC 31-19-4 applies to notice given to a
putative father and IC 31-19-4.5 applies to notice given to other
persons.
(b) If a petition for adoption alleges the consent of a putative father
or a parent to the adoption has not been obtained and is unnecessary
under:
(1) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(1);
(2) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(2);
(3) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(B);
(4) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(C);
(5) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(D);
(5) (6) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(9); or
(6) (7) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(11);
notice must be given under IC 31-19-4.5.
SECTION 10. IC 31-19-2.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.203-2021,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. Notice of the pendency of the adoption
proceedings does not have to be given to:
(1) a person whose consent to adoption has been filed with the
court;
(2) a person whose consent to adoption is not required by:
(A) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(A);
(B) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(D);
(C) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(E);
(C) (D) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(5);
(D) (E) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(6);
(E) (F) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(7);
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(F) (G) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(8);
(G) (H) IC 31-19-9-9;
(H) (I) IC 31-19-9-10;
(I) (J) IC 31-19-9-12;
(J) (K) IC 31-19-9-15; or
(K) (L) IC 31-19-9-18;
(3) the hospital of an infant's birth or a hospital to which an infant
is transferred for medical reasons after birth if the infant is being
adopted at or shortly after birth;
(4) a person whose parental rights have been terminated before
the entry of a final decree of adoption; or
(5) a person who has waived notice under:
(A) IC 31-19-4-8; or
(B) IC 31-19-4.5-4.
SECTION 11. IC 31-19-9-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.89-2023,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Consent to adoption, which may be required
under section 1 of this chapter, is not required from any of the
following:
(1) A parent or parents if the child is adjudged to have been
abandoned or deserted for at least six (6) months immediately
preceding the date of the filing of the petition for adoption.
(2) A parent of a child in the custody of another person if for a
period of at least one (1) year the parent:
(A) fails without justifiable cause to communicate
significantly with the child when able to do so; or
(B) knowingly fails to provide for the care and support of the
child when able to do so as required by law or judicial decree.
(3) The biological father of a child born out of wedlock whose
paternity has not been established:
(A) by a court proceeding other than the adoption proceeding;
or
(B) by executing a paternity affidavit under IC 16-37-2-2.1.
(4) The biological father of a child born out of wedlock who was
conceived as a result of:
(A) a rape for which the father was convicted under
IC 35-42-4-1;
(B) child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3);
(C) sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9); or
(D) sex with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9.5); or
(D) (E) incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(5) The putative father of a child born out of wedlock if the
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


putative father's consent to adoption is irrevocably implied under
section 15 of this chapter.
(6) The biological father of a child born out of wedlock if the:
(A) father's paternity is established after the filing of a petition
for adoption in a court proceeding or by executing a paternity
affidavit under IC 16-37-2-2.1; and
(B) father is required to but does not register with the putative
father registry established by IC 31-19-5 within the period
required by IC 31-19-5-12.
(7) A parent who has relinquished the parent's right to consent to
adoption as provided in this chapter.
(8) A parent after the parent-child relationship has been
terminated under IC 31-35 (or IC 31-6-5 before its repeal).
(9) A parent judicially declared incompetent or mentally defective
if the court dispenses with the parent's consent to adoption.
(10) A legal guardian or lawful custodian of the person to be
adopted who has failed to consent to the adoption for reasons
found by the court not to be in the best interests of the child.
(11) A parent if:
(A) a petitioner for adoption proves by clear and convincing
evidence that the parent is unfit to be a parent; and
(B) the best interests of the child sought to be adopted would
be served if the court dispensed with the parent's consent.
(12) A child's biological father who denies paternity of the child
before or after the birth of the child if the denial of paternity:
(A) is in writing;
(B) is signed by the child's father in the presence of a notary
public; and
(C) contains an acknowledgment that:
(i) the denial of paternity is irrevocable; and
(ii) the child's father will not receive notice of adoption
proceedings.
A child's father who denies paternity of the child under this
subdivision may not challenge or contest the child's adoption.
(13) A deceased person.
(b) If a parent has made only token efforts to support or to
communicate with the child the court may declare the child abandoned
by the parent.
SECTION 12. IC 31-19-10-1.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.203-2021,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.2. (a) If a petition for adoption alleges that a
parent's consent to adoption is unnecessary under:
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(1) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(1); or
(2) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(2);
and the parent files a motion to contest the adoption under section 1 of
this chapter, a petitioner for adoption has the burden of proving that the
parent's consent to the adoption is unnecessary under IC 31-19-9-8.
(b) If a petition for adoption alleges that a parent's consent to
adoption is unnecessary under:
(1) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(B); or
(2) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(C); or
(3) IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4)(D);
and the parent files a motion to contest the adoption under section 1 of
this chapter, the parent has the burden of proving that the child was not
conceived under circumstances that would cause the parent's consent
to be unnecessary under IC 31-19-9-8(a)(4). The absence of a criminal
prosecution and conviction is insufficient to satisfy the burden of proof.
(c) If a petition for adoption alleges that a parent's consent to
adoption is unnecessary under IC 31-19-9-8(a)(9) and the parent files
a motion to contest the adoption under section 1 of this chapter, a
petitioner for adoption has the burden of proving that the parent's
consent to the adoption is unnecessary under IC 31-19-9-8(a)(9).
(d) If a petition for adoption alleges that a legal guardian or lawful
custodian's consent to adoption is unnecessary under
IC 31-19-9-8(a)(10) and the legal guardian or lawful custodian files a
motion to contest the adoption under section 1 of this chapter, the legal
guardian or lawful custodian has the burden of proving that the
withholding of the consent to adoption is in the best interests of the
person sought to be adopted.
(e) If a petition for adoption alleges that a parent's consent to
adoption is unnecessary under IC 31-19-9-8(a)(11) and the parent files
a motion to contest the adoption under section 1 of this chapter, a
petitioner for adoption has the burden of proving that the requirements
of IC 31-19-9-8(a)(11) are satisfied and that the best interests of the
child are served if the court dispenses with the parent's consent to
adoption.
(f) If a petition for adoption alleges that a parent's consent to
adoption is unnecessary under:
(1) IC 31-19-9-9; or
(2) IC 31-19-9-10;
and the parent files a motion to contest the adoption under section 1 of
this chapter, a petitioner has the burden of proving that the
requirements of IC 31-19-9-9 or IC 31-19-9-10, respectively, are
satisfied and that the best interests of the child are served if the court
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


dispenses with the parent's consent to adoption.
(g) If a court finds that the person who filed the motion to contest
the adoption fails to:
(1) diligently prosecute the motion;
(2) comply with procedural rules and statutes governing contested
adoptions;
(3) obey an order of the court; or
(4) appear, after proper notice, at a hearing relating to the motion
to contest the adoption;
the court may dismiss the motion to contest with prejudice, and the
person's consent to the adoption shall be irrevocably implied.
(h) A court that dismisses a person's motion to contest under
subsection (g)(4) shall notify the person of the dismissal and may set
aside the dismissal if, not later than fourteen (14) days after the person
receives notice of the dismissal, the person files a motion with the court
setting forth facts that:
(1) establish good cause for the person's failure to appear; and
(2) if proven, demonstrate that the person's failure to appear was
reasonable.
SECTION 13. IC 31-27-4-35, AS ADDED BY P.L.145-2006,
SECTION 273, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 35. (a) A licensee must immediately
contact the department if:
(1) a foster child less than sixteen (16) eighteen (18) years of age,
while living in a foster home, engages in or is the victim of sexual
contact (as defined in IC 25-1-9-3.5);
(2) a foster child, while living in a foster home, is:
(A) charged with or adjudicated as having committed an act
that would be a crime under IC 35-42-4 if committed by an
adult;
(B) charged with or convicted of an offense under IC 35-42-4;
or
(C) the victim of an offense under IC 35-42-4; or
(3) the licensee learns that a foster child has, before placement
with the licensee, engaged in or been the victim of an act
described in subdivision (1) or (2).
(b) The information provided to the department under subsection (a)
must include:
(1) the name of the child;
(2) the date of the occurrence of the act if it can be determined;
(3) a description of the act;
(4) the name of the responding law enforcement agency if a law
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


enforcement agency is contacted; and
(5) any other information the licensee determines is relevant.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall provide
information described in subsection (b)(1) through (b)(4), whether
received from a licensee or another reliable source, to:
(1) a prospective licensee before the placement of the foster child
with that licensee; and
(2) each licensee with whom the foster child has previously been
placed.
(d) The notification requirements of subsection (c) apply to a foster
child who has:
(1) engaged in sexual contact (as defined in IC 25-1-9-3.5) if the
foster child is less than sixteen (16) eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) been charged with or adjudicated as having committed an act
that would be a crime under IC 35-42-4 if committed by an adult;
or
(3) been charged with or convicted of an offense under
IC 35-42-4.
SECTION 14. IC 31-34-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 41, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A child is a child in need of services if,
before the child becomes eighteen (18) years of age:
(1) the child is the victim of an offense under:
(A) IC 35-42-4-1;
(B) IC 35-42-4-2 (before its repeal);
(C) IC 35-42-4-3;
(D) IC 35-42-4-4;
(E) IC 35-42-4-5;
(F) IC 35-42-4-6;
(G) IC 35-42-4-7;
(H) IC 35-42-4-8;
(I) IC 35-42-4-9;
(J) IC 35-42-4-9.5;
(J) (K) IC 35-45-4-1;
(K) (L) IC 35-45-4-2;
(L) (M) IC 35-45-4-3;
(M) (N) IC 35-45-4-4; or
(N) (O) IC 35-46-1-3; and
(2) the child needs care, treatment, or rehabilitation that:
(A) the child is not receiving; and
(B) is unlikely to be provided or accepted without the coercive
intervention of the court.
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(b) A child is a child in need of services if, before the child becomes
eighteen (18) years of age, the child:
(1) lives in the same household as an adult who:
(A) committed an offense described in subsection (a)(1)
against a child and the offense resulted in a conviction or a
judgment under IC 31-34-11-2; or
(B) has been charged with an offense described in subsection
(a)(1) against a child and is awaiting trial; and
(2) needs care, treatment, or rehabilitation that:
(A) the child is not receiving; and
(B) is unlikely to be provided or accepted without the coercive
intervention of the court.
(c) A child is a child in need of services if, before the child becomes
eighteen (18) years of age:
(1) the child lives in the same household as another child who is
the victim of an offense described in subsection (a)(1);
(2) the child needs care, treatment, or rehabilitation that:
(A) the child is not receiving; and
(B) is unlikely to be provided or accepted without the coercive
intervention of the court; and
(3) a caseworker assigned to provide services to the child:
(A) places the child in a program of informal adjustment or
other family or rehabilitative services based on the existence
of the circumstances described in subdivisions (1) and (2), and
the caseworker subsequently determines further intervention
is necessary; or
(B) determines that a program of informal adjustment or other
family or rehabilitative services is inappropriate.
(d) A child is a child in need of services if, before the child becomes
eighteen (18) years of age:
(1) the child lives in the same household as an adult who:
(A) committed a human or sexual trafficking offense under
IC 35-42-3.5-1 through IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 or the law of another
jurisdiction, including federal law, that resulted in a conviction
or a judgment under IC 31-34-11-2; or
(B) has been charged with a human or sexual trafficking
offense under IC 35-42-3.5-1 through IC 35-42-3.5-1.4 or the
law of another jurisdiction, including federal law, and is
awaiting trial; and
(2) the child needs care, treatment, or rehabilitation that:
(A) the child is not receiving; and
(B) is unlikely to be provided or accepted without the coercive
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


intervention of the court.
SECTION 15. IC 31-34-21-5.6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.19-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), a
court may make a finding described in this section at any phase of a
child in need of services proceeding.
(b) Reasonable efforts to reunify a child with the child's parent,
guardian, or custodian or preserve a child's family as described in
section 5.5 of this chapter are not required if the court finds any of the
following:
(1) A parent, guardian, or custodian of the child has been
convicted of:
(A) an offense described in IC 31-35-3-4(1)(B) or
IC 31-35-3-4(1)(D) through IC 31-35-3-4(1)(J)
IC 31-35-3-4(1)(K) against a victim who is:
(i) a child described in IC 31-35-3-4(2)(B); or
(ii) a parent of the child; or
(B) a comparable offense as described in clause (A) in any
other state, territory, or country by a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(2) A parent, guardian, or custodian of the child:
(A) has been convicted of:
(i) the murder (IC 35-42-1-1) or voluntary manslaughter (IC
35-42-1-3) of a victim who is a child described in
IC 31-35-3-4(2)(B) or a parent of the child; or
(ii) a comparable offense described in item (i) in any other
state, territory, or country;
(B) has been convicted of:
(i) aiding, inducing, or causing another person;
(ii) attempting; or
(iii) conspiring with another person;
to commit an offense described in clause (A);
(C) is required to register:
(i) as a sex offender under 34 U.S.C. 20913; or
(ii) as a sex or violent offender under IC 36-2-13-5.5; or
(D) committed an offense described in IC 31-34-1-3 or
IC 31-34-1-3.5 against a child and the offense resulted in a
conviction or a judgment under IC 31-34-11-2.
(3) A parent, guardian, or custodian of the child has been
convicted of:
(A) battery as a Class A felony (for a crime committed before
July 1, 2014) or Level 2 felony (for a crime committed after
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


June 30, 2014);
(B) battery as a Class B felony (for a crime committed before
July 1, 2014) or Level 3 or Level 4 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014);
(C) battery as a Class C felony (for a crime committed before
July 1, 2014) or Level 5 felony (for a crime committed after
June 30, 2014);
(D) aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5);
(E) criminal recklessness (IC 35-42-2-2) as a Class C felony
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 5
felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014);
(F) neglect of a dependent (IC 35-46-1-4) as a Class B felony
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1 or
Level 3 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014);
(G) promotion of human labor trafficking, promotion of human
sexual trafficking, promotion of child sexual trafficking,
promotion of sexual trafficking of a younger child, child
sexual trafficking, or human trafficking (IC 35-42-3.5-1
through IC 35-42-3.5-1.4) as a felony; or
(H) a comparable offense described in clauses (A) through (G)
under federal law or in another state, territory, or country;
against a child described in IC 31-35-3-4(2)(B).
(4) The parental rights of a parent with respect to a biological or
adoptive sibling of the child have been involuntarily terminated
by a court under:
(A) IC 31-35-2 (involuntary termination involving a
delinquent child or a child in need of services);
(B) IC 31-35-3 (involuntary termination involving an
individual convicted of a criminal offense); or
(C) any comparable law described in clause (A) or (B) in any
other state, territory, or country.
(5) The child is an abandoned infant, provided that the court:
(A) has appointed a guardian ad litem or court appointed
special advocate for the child; and
(B) after receiving a written report and recommendation from
the guardian ad litem or court appointed special advocate, and
after a hearing, finds that reasonable efforts to locate the
child's parents or reunify the child's family would not be in the
best interests of the child.
(6) The child is a safe haven infant.
(7) The child:
(A) was the subject of two (2) or more previous:
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(i) child in need of services proceedings under this chapter;
or
(ii) proceedings under comparable law in another state; and
(B) was removed from the home of the child's parent,
guardian, or custodian under:
(i) a dispositional decree entered under IC 31-34-20-1; or
(ii) a court order issued under comparable law in another
state;
in each of the proceedings described in clause (A);
and the court finds that each removal described in clause (B) was
the result of conditions caused by the parent, guardian, or
custodian.
(c) During or at any time after the first periodic case review under
IC 31-34-21-2 of a child in need of services proceeding, if the court
finds that a parent, guardian, or custodian of the child has been charged
with an offense described in subsection (b)(3) and is awaiting trial, the
court may make a finding that reasonable efforts to reunify the child
with the child's parent, guardian, or custodian or preserve the child's
family as described in section 5.5 of this chapter may be suspended
pending the disposition of the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
criminal charge.
SECTION 16. IC 31-35-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2013,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. If:
(1) an individual is convicted of the offense of:
(A) murder (IC 35-42-1-1);
(B) causing suicide (IC 35-42-1-2);
(C) voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3);
(D) involuntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-4);
(E) rape (IC 35-42-4-1);
(F) criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (repealed);
(G) child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3);
(H) child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4);
(I) sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9); or
(J) sex with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9.5); or
(J) (K) incest (IC 35-46-1-3); and
(2) the victim of the offense:
(A) was less than:
(i) sixteen (16) years of age at the time of the offense for an
offense described in subdivision (1)(A) through (1)(I) or
subdivision (1)(K); and or
(ii) eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the offense
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


for an offense described in subdivision (1)(J); and
(B) is:
(i) the individual's biological or adoptive child; or
(ii) the child of a spouse of the individual who has
committed the offense;
the attorney for the department, the child's guardian ad litem, or the
court appointed special advocate may file a petition with the juvenile
or probate court to terminate the parent-child relationship of the
individual who has committed the offense with the victim of the
offense, the victim's siblings, or any biological or adoptive child of that
individual.
SECTION 17. IC 35-31.5-2-216, AS AMENDED BY P.L.48-2017,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 216. "Offense relating to a criminal sexual act"
means the following:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (repealed).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(5) Prostitution (IC 35-45-4-2).
(6) Making an unlawful proposition (IC 35-45-4-3).
(7) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(8) Sexual misconduct with a minor under IC 35-42-4-9(a).
(9) Sex with a minor under IC 35-42-4-9.5(a).
SECTION 18. IC 35-38-2-2.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2010,
SECTION 142, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.4. As a condition of probation, the
court may require a sex offender (as defined in IC 11-8-8-4.5) to:
(1) participate in a treatment program for sex offenders approved
by the court; and
(2) avoid contact with any person who is less than sixteen (16)
eighteen (18) years of age unless the probationer:
(A) receives the court's approval; or
(B) successfully completes the treatment program referred to
in subdivision (1).
SECTION 19. IC 35-38-2-2.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.13-2016,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) As used in this section, "offender" means
an individual convicted of a sex offense.
(b) As used in this section, "sex offense" means any of the
following:
(1) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(2) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (repealed).
(3) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(4) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(5) Vicarious sexual gratification (IC 35-42-4-5).
(6) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(7) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(8) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
(9) Sexual misconduct with a minor as a felony (IC 35-42-4-9).
(10) Sex with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9.5).
(10) (11) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(c) A condition of remaining on probation or parole after conviction
for a sex offense is that the offender not reside within one (1) mile of
the residence of the victim of the offender's sex offense.
(d) An offender:
(1) who will be placed on probation shall provide the sentencing
court and the probation department with the address where the
offender intends to reside during the period of probation:
(A) at the time of sentencing if the offender will be placed on
probation without first being incarcerated; or
(B) before the offender's release from incarceration if the
offender will be placed on probation after completing a term
of incarceration; or
(2) who will be placed on parole shall provide the parole board
with the address where the offender intends to reside during the
period of parole.
(e) An offender, while on probation or parole, may not establish a
new residence within one (1) mile of the residence of the victim of the
offender's sex offense unless the offender first obtains a waiver from
the:
(1) court, if the offender is placed on probation; or
(2) parole board, if the offender is placed on parole;
for the change of address under subsection (f).
(f) The court or parole board may waive the requirement set forth in
subsection (c) only if the court or parole board, at a hearing at which
the offender is present and of which the prosecuting attorney has been
notified, determines that:
(1) the offender has successfully completed a sex offender
treatment program during the period of probation or parole;
(2) the offender is in compliance with all terms of the offender's
probation or parole; and
(3) good cause exists to allow the offender to reside within one (1)
mile of the residence of the victim of the offender's sex offense.
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


However, the court or parole board may not grant a waiver under this
subsection if the offender is a sexually violent predator under
IC 35-38-1-7.5 or if the offender is an offender against children under
IC 35-42-4-11.
(g) If the court or parole board grants a waiver under subsection (f),
the court or parole board shall state in writing the reasons for granting
the waiver. The court's written statement of its reasons shall be
incorporated into the record.
(h) The address of the victim of the offender's sex offense is
confidential even if the court or parole board grants a waiver under
subsection (f).
SECTION 20. IC 35-38-2-2.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.5-2022,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.7. As a condition of probation or parole after
conviction for a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2), the court
shall prohibit the convicted person from using a social networking web
site website or an instant messaging or chat room program to
communicate with a child less than sixteen (16) eighteen (18) years of
age. However, the court may permit the offender to communicate using
a social networking web site website or an instant messaging or chat
room program with:
(1) the offender's own child, stepchild, or sibling; or
(2) another relative of the offender specifically named in the
court's order.
SECTION 21. IC 35-41-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
a prosecution for an offense is barred unless it is commenced:
(1) within five (5) years after the commission of the offense, in
the case of a Class B, Class C, or Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 3, Level 4, Level 5, or
Level 6 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014); or
(2) within two (2) years after the commission of the offense, in the
case of a misdemeanor.
(b) A prosecution for a Class B or Class C felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony
(for a crime committed after June 30, 2014) that would otherwise be
barred under this section may be commenced within one (1) year after
the earlier of the date on which the state:
(1) first discovers evidence sufficient to charge the offender with
the offense through DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) analysis; or
(2) could have discovered evidence sufficient to charge the
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


offender with the offense through DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid)
analysis by the exercise of due diligence.
However, if the offense is a sex offense against a child described in
subsection (m), a prosecution otherwise barred under this section may
be prosecuted in accordance with subsection (p).
(c) Except as provided in subsection (e), a prosecution for a Class
A felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 1
felony or Level 2 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014)
may be commenced at any time.
(d) A prosecution for murder may be commenced:
(1) at any time; and
(2) regardless of the amount of time that passes between:
(A) the date a person allegedly commits the elements of
murder; and
(B) the date the alleged victim of the murder dies.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (p), a prosecution for the
following offenses is barred unless commenced before the date that the
alleged victim of the offense reaches thirty-one (31) years of age:
(1) IC 35-42-4-3 (Child molesting).
(2) IC 35-42-4-5 (Vicarious sexual gratification).
(3) IC 35-42-4-6 (Child solicitation).
(4) IC 35-42-4-7 (Child seduction).
(5) IC 35-42-4-9 (Sexual misconduct with a minor).
(6) IC 35-42-4-9.5 (Sex with a minor).
(6) (7) IC 35-46-1-3 (Incest).
(f) A prosecution for forgery of an instrument for payment of
money, or for the uttering of a forged instrument, under IC 35-43-5-2,
is barred unless it is commenced within five (5) years after the maturity
of the instrument.
(g) If a complaint, indictment, or information is dismissed because
of an error, defect, insufficiency, or irregularity, a new prosecution may
be commenced within ninety (90) days after the dismissal even if the
period of limitation has expired at the time of dismissal, or will expire
within ninety (90) days after the dismissal.
(h) The period within which a prosecution must be commenced does
not include any period in which:
(1) the accused person is not usually and publicly resident in
Indiana or so conceals himself or herself that process cannot be
served;
(2) the accused person conceals evidence of the offense, and
evidence sufficient to charge the person with that offense is
unknown to the prosecuting authority and could not have been
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


discovered by that authority by exercise of due diligence; or
(3) the accused person is a person elected or appointed to office
under statute or constitution, if the offense charged is theft or
conversion of public funds or bribery while in public office.
(i) For purposes of tolling the period of limitation only, a
prosecution is considered commenced on the earliest of these dates:
(1) The date of filing of an indictment, information, or complaint
before a court having jurisdiction.
(2) The date of issuance of a valid arrest warrant.
(3) The date of arrest of the accused person by a law enforcement
officer without a warrant, if the officer has authority to make the
arrest.
(j) A prosecution is considered timely commenced for any offense
to which the defendant enters a plea of guilty, notwithstanding that the
period of limitation has expired.
(k) The following apply to the specified offenses:
(1) A prosecution for an offense under IC 30-2-9-7(b) (misuse of
funeral trust funds) is barred unless commenced within five (5)
years after the date of death of the settlor (as described in
IC 30-2-9).
(2) A prosecution for an offense under IC 30-2-10-9(b) (misuse
of funeral trust funds) is barred unless commenced within five (5)
years after the date of death of the settlor (as described in
IC 30-2-10).
(3) A prosecution for an offense under IC 30-2-13-38(f) (misuse
of funeral trust or escrow account funds) is barred unless
commenced within five (5) years after the date of death of the
purchaser (as defined in IC 30-2-13-9).
(l) A prosecution for an offense under IC 23-2-6, IC 23-2.5,
IC 23-14-48-9, or IC 23-19 is barred unless commenced within five (5)
years after the earlier of the date on which the state:
(1) first discovers evidence sufficient to charge the offender with
the offense; or
(2) could have discovered evidence sufficient to charge the
offender with the offense by the exercise of due diligence.
(m) Except as provided in subsection (p), a prosecution for a sex
offense listed in IC 11-8-8-4.5 that is committed against a child and
that is not:
(1) a Class A felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014)
or a Level 1 felony or Level 2 felony (for a crime committed after
June 30, 2014); or
(2) listed in subsection (e);
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


is barred unless commenced within ten (10) years after the commission
of the offense, or within four (4) years after the person ceases to be a
dependent of the person alleged to have committed the offense,
whichever occurs later.
(n) A prosecution for rape (IC 35-42-4-1) as a Class B felony (for a
crime committed before July 1, 2014) or as a Level 3 felony (for a
crime committed after June 30, 2014) that would otherwise be barred
under this section may be commenced not later than ten (10) years after
the earlier of the date on which:
(1) the state first discovers evidence sufficient to charge the
offender with the offense through DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid)
analysis;
(2) the state first becomes aware of the existence of a recording
(as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-273) that provides evidence sufficient
to charge the offender with the offense; or
(3) a person confesses to the offense.
(o) A prosecution for criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2)
(repealed) as a Class B felony for a crime committed before July 1,
2014, that would otherwise be barred under this section may be
commenced not later than five (5) years after the earliest of the date on
which:
(1) the state first discovers evidence sufficient to charge the
offender with the offense through DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid)
analysis;
(2) the state first becomes aware of the existence of a recording
(as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-273) that provides evidence sufficient
to charge the offender with the offense; or
(3) a person confesses to the offense.
(p) A prosecution for an offense described in subsection (e) or
subsection (m) that would otherwise be barred under this section may
be commenced not later than five (5) years after the earliest of the date
on which:
(1) the state first discovers evidence sufficient to charge the
offender with the offense through DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid)
analysis;
(2) the state first becomes aware of the existence of a recording
(as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-273) that provides evidence sufficient
to charge the offender with the offense; or
(3) a person confesses to the offense.
SECTION 22. IC 35-42-4-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) A person at least:
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(1) twenty-four (24) years of age who, with a child who is
sixteen (16) years of age; or
(2) twenty-five (25) years of age who, with a child who is at
least sixteen (16) years of age but less than eighteen (18) years
of age;
performs or submits to sexual intercourse or other sexual conduct
(as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-221.5) commits sex with a minor, a
Level 5 felony.
(b) A person at least:
(1) twenty-four (24) years of age who, with a child who is
sixteen (16) years of age; or
(2) twenty-five (25) years of age who, with a child who is at
least sixteen (16) years of age but less than eighteen (18) years
of age;
performs or submits to any fondling or touching of either the child
or the older person, with intent to arouse or to satisfy the sexual
desires of either the child or the older person, commits sex with a
minor, a Level 6 felony.
(c) It is a defense that the accused person reasonably believed
that the child was at least eighteen (18) years of age at the time of
the conduct.
(d) It is a defense that the child is or has ever been married.
SECTION 23. IC 35-42-4-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.5-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) This section applies only to a sex offender
(as defined in IC 11-8-8-4.5).
(b) A sex offender who knowingly or intentionally violates a:
(1) condition of probation;
(2) condition of parole; or
(3) rule of a community transition program;
that prohibits the offender from using a social networking web site
website or an instant messaging or chat room program to communicate
with a child less than sixteen (16) eighteen (18) years of age commits
a sex offender Internet offense, a Class A misdemeanor. However, the
offense is a Level 6 felony if the person has a prior unrelated
conviction under this section.
(c) It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection (b) that the
person reasonably believed that the child was at least sixteen (16)
eighteen (18) years of age.
SECTION 24. IC 35-42-4-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) As used in this section, "serious sex
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


offender" means a person required to register as a sex offender under
IC 11-8-8 who is:
(1) found to be a sexually violent predator under IC 35-38-1-7.5;
or
(2) convicted of one (1) or more of the following offenses:
(A) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(B) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(C) Possession of child sex abuse material (IC 35-42-4-4(d) or
IC 35-42-4-4(e)).
(D) Vicarious sexual gratification (IC 35-42-4-5(a) and
IC 35-42-4-5(b)).
(E) Performing sexual conduct in the presence of a minor (IC
35-42-4-5(c)).
(F) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(G) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(H) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9).
(I) Sex with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9.5).
(b) A serious sex offender who knowingly or intentionally enters
school property commits unlawful entry by a serious sex offender, a
Level 6 felony.
(c) It is a defense to a prosecution under subsection (b) that:
(1) a religious institution or house of worship is located on the
school property; and
(2) the person:
(A) enters the school property or other entity described in
IC 35-31.5-2-285(1)(A) through IC 35-31.5-2-285(1)(D) when
classes, extracurricular activities, or any other school activities
are not being held:
(i) for the sole purpose of attending worship services or
receiving religious instruction; and
(ii) not earlier than thirty (30) minutes before the beginning
of the worship services or religious instruction; and
(B) leaves the school property not later than thirty (30)
minutes after the conclusion of the worship services or
religious instruction.
SECTION 25. IC 35-44.1-3-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.45-2022,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. A person who is being supervised on lifetime
parole (as described in IC 35-50-6-1) and who knowingly or
intentionally:
(1) violates a condition (including a special condition imposed by
the parole board) of lifetime parole; or
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106


(2) without the authorization of the parole board, has direct or
indirect contact with:
(A) a child less than sixteen (16) eighteen (18) years of age;
or
(B) the victim of a sex offense committed by the person;
commits criminal violation of a lifetime parole condition, a Level 6
felony. However, the offense is a Level 5 felony if the person has a
prior unrelated conviction under this section.
SECTION 26. IC 35-50-2-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.142-2020,
SECTION 86, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) As used in this section, "sex offense"
means a felony conviction under IC 35-42-4-1 through IC 35-42-4-9
IC 35-42-4-9.5 or under IC 35-46-1-3.
(b) The state may seek to have a person sentenced as a repeat sexual
offender for a sex offense described in subsection (a) by alleging, on a
page separate from the rest of the charging instrument, that the person
has accumulated one (1) prior unrelated felony conviction for a sex
offense described in subsection (a).
(c) After a person has been convicted and sentenced for a felony
described in subsection (a) after having been sentenced for a prior
unrelated sex offense described in subsection (a), the person has
accumulated one (1) prior unrelated felony sex offense conviction.
However, a conviction does not count for purposes of this subsection,
if:
(1) it has been set aside; or
(2) it is a conviction for which the person has been pardoned.
(d) If the person was convicted of the sex offense in a jury trial, the
jury shall reconvene to hear evidence in the enhancement hearing. If
the trial was to the court, or the judgment was entered on a guilty plea,
the court alone shall hear evidence in the enhancement hearing.
(e) A person is a repeat sexual offender if the jury (if the hearing is
by jury) or the court (if the hearing is to the court alone) finds that the
state has proved beyond a reasonable doubt that the person had
accumulated one (1) prior unrelated felony sex offense conviction.
(f) The court may sentence a person found to be a repeat sexual
offender to an additional fixed term that is the advisory sentence for the
underlying offense. However, the additional sentence may not exceed
ten (10) years.
2026 IN 290—LS 6544/DI 106